Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1 General Provisions
3-1-104. Residence requirements — Counties electing two or more direct representatives.

In those counties entitled to elect two (2) or more direct representatives and divided by §3-1-103 into representative districts, a candidate for election to the office of representative shall not be required to reside in the representative district from which such candidate seeks to be elected, but shall be a resident of the county.

Acts 1965 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 11; modified; T.C.A., § 3-111.

Cross-References. District to be represented by a qualified voter of that district, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 5a.

Residence requirements for senatorial candidates, §3-1-102.

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed law that would require a candidate to have resided in the district to be represented for one year immediately preceding the election would not be constitutional, OAG 05-044 (4/8/05).

3-1-105. Oaths of office.

The speaker of the senate may administer the official oath to any senators-elect, in the presence of the senate.

The speaker of the house of representatives may administer the official oath to any members-elect of the house of representatives, in the presence of the house.

The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives may also administer the oath of office to the clerks and doorkeepers of their respective houses.

The members of the general assembly may administer the official oath of office for any local public official of any municipality or county, including any county having metropolitan form of government, or any other political subdivision of the state.

For purposes of this section, “local public official” means a person elected or appointed to any office or entity of local government.

Acts 1865-1866, ch. 25, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 223-225; mod. Code 1932, §§ 163-165; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-112; Acts 2014, ch. 576, § 1.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 576, § 2. March 28, 2014.

3-1-106. Expenses — Mileage allowances.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of the general assembly shall be paid for the member's expenses in attending legislative sessions and legislative committee meetings, and such conferences, symposiums, workshops, assemblages, gatherings and other official meetings and endeavors concerning state business and the duties of a legislator, held within or without the state of Tennessee, as are attended by members of the general assembly with the approval or at the direction of the speaker of either house or both houses. Expense and mileage allowances shall be paid for attending sessions and such other meetings as provided in this section. For attendance at such conferences, symposiums, workshops and meetings which are held outside this state, each member shall additionally receive the expense allowance provided in subsection (b) for one (1) day preceding and one (1) day following such activities if such days are required for travel purposes.

Each member shall be paid an expense allowance equal to the allowance granted federal employees for expenditure reimbursement for the Nashville area for each legislative day, which is defined as each day the general assembly, or either house thereof, officially convenes for the transaction of business, or for each day in attendance at any such other meeting as described in subsection (a).

In addition to the other provisions of this section, a member of the general assembly who is attending a conference, symposium, workshop or other official meeting outside this state with the approval or at the direction of the speaker of either house, or both houses, shall be reimbursed for the actual receipted costs of a standard grade hotel room and intra-city transportation. Costs of meals shall be reimbursed out of the expense allowance otherwise provided by this section.

A member whose principal residence is fifty (50) miles from the capitol or less shall only be paid an expense allowance for meals and incidentals equal to the allowance granted federal employees for such expenses in the Nashville area for each legislative day in Nashville or any day the member participates in any other meeting or endeavor as described in subsection (a) held in Nashville; provided, however, that, if such member is unable to return home at the conclusion of any such day, with the express approval of the speaker of such member's house, the member shall be reimbursed an expense allowance for lodging equal to the allowance granted federal employees for lodging expense in the Nashville area.

Each member shall be paid a mileage allowance per mile, equal to the mileage allowance authorized for state employees who have been authorized to use personally owned vehicles in the daily performance of their duties, for each mile traveled from the member's home to the seat of government and back, limited to one (1) round trip each week of any legislative session, and one (1) round trip from the member's home to the site of any such other meeting as described in subsection (a); provided, that a member whose principal residence is fifty (50) miles from the capitol or less shall be paid a mileage allowance per mile traveled for each legislative day in Nashville or any Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday or Thursday that the member participates in any other meeting or endeavor as described in subsection (a) held in Nashville, limited to one (1) round trip per day. The preceding allowance shall be paid only in the case of attendance at such meetings described in subsection (a) as are held within the state of Tennessee. In the case of travel to out-of-state meetings, each member traveling by commercial conveyance shall be reimbursed for the member's actual travel expenses which can include, but are not limited to, mileage to and from the member's home to the airport, parking fees at the airport, limousine or taxi fares to and from the member's hotel or motel, or public conveyance charges to and from a hotel or motel to a meeting place. Appropriate receipts shall be provided with the travel expenses claim. Each member traveling by the member's personally provided vehicle shall be reimbursed at the mileage rate fixed herein, as adjusted in accordance with the provisions of § 8-23-101. The reimbursement rate provided for by the first sentence of this subsection (c) shall be adjusted after the election of each general assembly at which time the rate shall be revised to reflect the reimbursement rate allowed state employees on the day previous to the regular November election, and the rate as adjusted shall continue in effect during the term of that general assembly. The first such adjustment shall take effect November 6, 1984.

In lieu of the mileage allowance provided in subsection (c), a member who resides more than one hundred (100) miles from Nashville may be reimbursed the cost of a coach-class airline ticket from the member's home to the seat of government and back, limited to one (1) round trip each week of any legislative session or may be reimbursed the cost of a coach-class airline ticket from the member's home to the seat of government and back, limited to one (1) round trip for attendance, approved by the speaker, for each committee meeting.

In lieu of the mileage allowance provided in subsection (c), a member who resides more than one hundred (100) miles from the site of a committee meeting may be reimbursed the cost of a coach-class airline ticket from the member's home to the airport nearest the site of such meeting and back, limited to one (1) round trip for attendance, approved by the speaker, for each such meeting.

For the purposes of this subsection (d), coach class shall be construed as the lowest fare available.

Each member of the general assembly shall be paid the member's expenses for transportation from an airport to the site of destination pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (d).

Senators, when sitting as a court of impeachment, shall be paid expense and mileage allowances at the same rate and under the same conditions.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2), each member of the general assembly shall be paid a monthly expense allowance of one thousand dollars ($1,000), to provide for expenses necessitated in connection with the member's official duties when away from the seat of government including, but not limited to, telecommunications, office, secretarial and other assistance or incidental expenses.

In lieu of being paid the monthly expense in the manner provided in subdivision (f)(1), a member who is receiving early retirement benefits from social security may decline, in whole or in part, any such authorized expense and may apply to the appropriate speaker for reimbursement of actual monthly documented expenses otherwise authorized in this subsection (f); provided, that in no event shall the reimbursement requested exceed the maximum amount of expenditure authorized under subdivision (f)(1). If such member elects to be reimbursed as provided in this subdivision (f)(2), the records of the department of finance and administration shall reflect that such payments are a reimbursement for expenses incurred.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, each member of the house of representatives shall be limited to one (1) round trip each week from such representative's home to the seat of government when the general assembly is not in session to attend meetings for which reimbursement is otherwise authorized by this section.

For the purpose of this section, “fifty (50) miles from the capitol” means the most commonly traveled route between the member's principal residence and the state capitol building.

Acts 1967, ch. 6, § 1; 1971, ch. 105, § 1; 1972, ch. 526, § 1; 1974, ch. 613, § 1; 1975, ch. 24, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-114; Acts 1981, ch. 494, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 265, § 1; 1984, ch. 600, § 1; 1984, ch. 709, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 975, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 1027, § 1; 1990, ch. 867, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 940, § 1; 2004, ch. 638, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 955, § 2; 2013, ch. 241, §§ 1-4.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment, effective November 4, 2014, added “Except as otherwise provided in this section,” to the beginning of the first sentence of (a); added (b)(3); added the proviso at the end of the first sentence of (c); and added (h).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 241, § 5. November 4, 2014.

Cross-References. Reimbursement for subcommittee meeting expenses, §3-7-102.

3-1-107. Salaries.

Beginning with the election of the Ninety-Sixth General Assembly, each member shall receive an annual salary of sixteen thousand five hundred dollars ($16,500), payable in equal monthly installments, which shall be in addition to all other expenses and allowances provided by law.

Beginning with the election of the Ninety-Seventh General Assembly, in addition to the base annual salary provided in subdivision (a)(1), during the interim between sessions, for each day while performing official duties as a legislator attending to state business at the seat of government, each member may receive supplemental compensation in an amount as provided in § 3-1-106(b)(1). Such days shall be certified by the member to the speaker of the respective house for prior approval.

In lieu of the salary provided in subsection (a), the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall receive an annual salary equal to three (3) times the amount of the salary provided in subsection (a), payable in equal monthly installments, which shall be in addition to all other expenses and allowances provided by law.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2), for the fiscal year beginning in 2005, and for each subsequent fiscal year, the base salary fixed in subdivision (a)(1) shall be adjusted to reflect the average percentage pay increase provided for state employees by the general appropriations act. However, any adjustments occurring during a term of the general assembly shall not take effect until the election of the next general assembly. On or before November 1 of each year, the comptroller of the treasury shall certify to the office of legislative administration such average increase in state employee's compensation during that fiscal year.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, beginning with the election of the One Hundred Twelfth General Assembly, the base salary of each member shall not be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) for fiscal year 2020-2021.

Acts 1969, ch. 307, §§ 1, 2; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 526, § 2; T.C.A., § 3-115; Acts 1984, ch. 709, §§ 4, 5; 1988, ch. 972, § 1; 1988, ch. 1027, § 2; 1990, ch. 867, § 3; 2004, ch. 955, § 1; 2020, ch. 759, §§ 10, 11.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2),” in (c); and added (c)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 759, § 18. June 30, 2020.

Cross-References. General assembly allowed to fix salaries, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 23.

3-1-108. Joint convention for state-of-the-state address.

During the first week of each regular session of the general assembly which begins in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution of Tennessee, article II, § 8 in each odd-numbered year and during the first week of any adjourned session in an even-numbered year, the general assembly shall by joint resolution call a joint convention of the senate and house of representatives to convene in the chamber of the house of representatives for the purpose of hearing a state-of-the-state address by the governor.

No public funds shall be expended for advertising or otherwise publicizing the broadcast or televised coverage of such an address.

In the governor's annual state-of-the-state address to the general assembly, the governor is invited to review the progress of the state on all fronts during the past year, the major problems currently facing the state, and those that can reasonably be anticipated in the coming year, and the governor's proposals and recommendations for handling such problems.

Acts 1973, ch. 55, § 1; 1979, ch. 27, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-116.

Cross-References. Governor required to provide information of state of government, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 11.

3-1-109. Office space, equipment, and supplies.

The county legislative body of any county having a population of not less than eighty-three thousand three hundred (83,300) and not more than eighty-three thousand four hundred (83,400) according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census shall be authorized to provide any member of the general assembly representing such county, or any part thereof, with suitable office space, office furniture, equipment, and supplies. Such office shall be located in such county in a location determined by the county legislative body.

Acts 1983, ch. 301, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

3-1-110. Business or occupation participation not part-time or temporary.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a member of the general assembly shall not be considered as participating in a business or occupation on a part-time or temporary basis because of such member's attendance at sessions or committee meetings of the general assembly.

Acts 1988, ch. 1031, § 1.

3-1-111. Official flag of the general assembly.

The official and permanent flag of the general assembly shall be the official legislative flag denoted and described in House Joint Resolution No. 531 of the Ninetieth General Assembly, which resolution was adopted by the Ninetieth General Assembly on March 29, 1978.

The official flag of the general assembly is on a field of white to symbolize purity. The color blue represents the love Tennesseans feel for their state and red signifies that in times of war and peace Tennesseans are true-blooded Americans. Each star depicts one (1) of the three (3) grand divisions of the state. Wheat portrays the agricultural heritage and richness of Tennessee and our respect for our bountiful natural resources. Finally, the gavel indicates the power of the people which is vested in the general assembly.

The official flag of the general assembly shall be appropriately displayed in the chambers of the house of representatives and senate.

The facilities manager for the legislative complex shall ensure that the official flag of the general assembly be flown over the State Capitol when either house of the general assembly is in session.

The facilities manager shall also ensure that the official flag of the general assembly is flown over the Legislative Plaza.

Acts 1993, ch. 497, §§ 2-5.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

3-1-112. Toll-free telephone service to the general assembly — Access for the deaf.

The general assembly shall establish a toll-free telephone service to enable citizens within the state to call the general assembly free of charge. One (1) toll-free telephone line shall be used and be in operation Monday through Friday for twelve (12) hours beginning at seven o'clock a.m. (7:00 a.m.) and ending at seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.), central time, during the legislative session of the general assembly. By use of a voice mail system, such service shall enable members of the public to leave messages for members of the general assembly, receive information pertaining to the legislative calendars for the senate and house of representatives, and receive information on the status of legislation currently before the general assembly.

The general assembly shall establish a toll-free telephone service using a telecommunications device for the deaf to enable deaf citizens to call the general assembly free of charge. One (1) toll-free telephone line using a telecommunications device for the deaf shall be used and shall be in operation Monday through Friday for twelve (12) hours beginning at seven o'clock a.m. (7:00 a.m.) and ending at seven o'clock p.m. (7:00 p.m.), central time, during the legislative session of the general assembly. By use of a voice mail system which employs technology that serves deaf persons, such service will enable deaf members of the public to leave messages for members of the general assembly, receive information pertaining to the legislative calendars for the senate and house of representatives, and receive information on the status of legislation currently before the general assembly.

Acts 1995, ch. 180, § 1; 1997, ch. 435, § 1.

3-1-113. Purchases of computer equipment by members.

A member of the general assembly may purchase through the office of legislative administration computer equipment for legislative use which is the same as or compatible with the computer hardware or software installed or used by legislative information systems for the general assembly. The cost of any purchases made pursuant to this section shall be borne by the member of the general assembly requesting the purchase of such items. The office of legislative information systems is authorized to install and maintain, at its office in Nashville, such computer programs and equipment purchased by the member for legislative use. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the office of legislative information from providing information systems and technical support to the member by telephone, email or other type of electronic communication.

Acts 1997, ch. 474, § 2.

3-1-114. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to legislators of publication of report.

If a statute requires an official or entity of state government to make a report to each member of the general assembly, the statute is satisfied if the official or entity notifies each of the members in writing to each member's office that the report has been published. A member may then notify the official or entity if the member chooses to receive a copy of the report. The member may give such notice by electronic mail or facsimile transmission. The notice shall provide a date or a period of time in which the member shall respond. A failure of a member to respond to the notice shall be considered the same as a member declining to receive a copy of such report.

Acts 1998, ch. 790, § 1.

Cross-References. Comprehensive annual report of the status of child care agencies, §37-5-519.

3-1-115. Orientation on ethics laws and rules for general assembly members.

An orientation shall be provided to all members elected or appointed to serve for their first term or partial term of office in the general assembly, which shall include, as part of the orientation, instruction on ethics laws and rules that pertain to members of the general assembly.

Acts 2005, ch. 451, § 1.

3-1-116. Group health insurance not applicable to certain members of general assembly — Exceptions.

The provisions of § 8-27-203 [repealed and reenacted. See Compiler's Notes] shall not apply to persons who are appointed to fill a vacancy in the general assembly, or to persons elected to fill an unexpired term in the general assembly, unless such person:

Was elected to serve a full term of office as a member of the general assembly prior to such appointment or election; or

Is elected to a full term of office as a member of the general assembly following such appointment or election to fill the unexpired term.

Except as provided in subsection (a), after June 20, 2005, any person appointed to fill a vacancy in the general assembly, or elected to fill an unexpired term in the general assembly, is not eligible to participate in the state employees' health group insurance plan, except during the general assembly in which such person fills the unexpired term of office by appointment or election.

Acts 2005, ch. 476, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section8-27-203 referred to in (a) was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2015, ch. 426, effective May 18, 2015. Current similar provisions may now be found in §8-27-208.

3-1-117. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §3-1-117 (Acts 2005, ch. 486, § 1), concerning the special joint legislative study committee regarding governmental ethics, was deemed obsolete and was deleted by the code commission in 2014.

3-1-118. Open meetings — Exceptions — Enforcement.

Every meeting of the general assembly, senate, house of representatives, or any joint committee, standing committee, statutory committee, special committee, select committee, oversight committee, ad hoc committee, any other committee or any subcommittee shall be open to the public. Only when considering a matter involving the security of the state or nation or when investigating a proposed Article V impeachment of a public official other than a member of the general assembly, pursuant to Article V of the Constitution of Tennessee, may a meeting be closed to the public, but only if there is an affirmative vote of at least three-fourths (¾) of the members present. Adequate public notice of every meeting shall be provided. The term “meeting” means at least a quorum of the members of a subcommittee, committee, the senate, the house of representatives, or the general assembly is present and public business within the jurisdiction of that body is being deliberated and decided.

Procedures for enforcing the provisions of subsection (a) shall be set forth in the rules of the senate and the rules of the house of representatives.

The 104th general assembly recognizes that the appellate courts of Tennessee, in specifically considering the open meetings laws, compiled in title 8, chapter 44, have unequivocally ruled that Article II, § 12 of the Constitution of Tennessee prevents this or any other general assembly from statutorily binding a future general assembly on rules of proceedings. Therefore, this general assembly truthfully acknowledges that subsection (a) can be legally binding only for the duration of the 104th general assembly. However, each future general assembly is strongly encouraged and vigorously urged to adopt rules incorporating provisions no less open than subsection (a).

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 41.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 of the extraordinary session of the 104th general assembly provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-1-119. Statement disclosing contributions and expenditures for each caucus of the general assembly — Maintenance of caucus records and accounts.

Each caucus of the general assembly shall make a full disclosure of the sources of contributions received and expenditures made by submitting statements to the registry of election finance within ten (10) days following the conclusion of the quarterly periods ending March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31. A statement filed pursuant to this section shall consist of either:

A statement that neither the contributions received nor the expenditures made during the period for which the statement is submitted exceeded one thousand dollars ($1,000). Any statement filed pursuant to this section shall indicate whether an unexpended balance of contributions, continuing debts and obligations or an expenditure deficit exists; or

A statement setting forth, under contributions, a list of all the contributions received, including the full name, complete address, occupation, and employer of each person who contributed a total amount of more than one hundred dollars ($100) during the period for which the statement is submitted, and the amount contributed by that person. The statement shall include the date of the receipt of each contribution. “Date of the receipt”, as used in this subdivision (a)(2)(A), means the date when the contribution was received by the caucus. The statement shall list as a single item the total amount of contributions of one hundred dollars ($100) or less; and

A statement setting forth, under expenditures, a list of all expenditures made, including the full name and address of each person to whom a total amount of more than one hundred dollars ($100) was paid during the period for which the statement is submitted, the total amount paid to that person, and the purpose of the expenditure. The words “reimbursement”, “credit card purchase”, “other” and “campaign expense” shall not be considered acceptable descriptions for “purpose”. Any purchase made with a credit card shall also be disclosed as a payment to the vendor providing the item or service. Credit card payments to separate vendors shall be disclosed as separate expenditures. The statement shall list the total amount of expenditures of one hundred dollars ($100) or less each, by category, without showing the exact amount of or vouching for each such expenditure.

Each caucus of the general assembly shall maintain its records and financial accounts in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles, shall retain the records for a period of at least five (5) years after the close of the appropriate fiscal year, and shall make the records available for audit and review by the state upon request of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designated representative.

For purposes of this section, “caucus” means any association whose majority membership consists of members of the general assembly that seeks to pursue, promote or support a common interest, including, but not limited to, a political party. “Caucus” does not include any standing, special, select, ad hoc, or statutory subcommittee or committee of the general assembly.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 of the extraordinary session of the 104th general assembly provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-1-120. Mass mailings sent within thirty days of an election.

Any mass mailings, including surveys and newsletters, that a member of the general assembly sends to persons in the member's district within thirty (30) days of any election in which the member's name appears on the ballot shall be paid from non-state funds.

For purposes of subsection (a):

“Election” does not include any early voting period; and

“Mass mailing” means more than two hundred (200) pieces of substantially similar material mailed within a seven-day period, but does not include a form letter or other mail that is sent in response to an unsolicited request, letter or other inquiry.

Acts 2007, ch. 288, § 1.

3-1-121. Tennessee Legislative Record.

The legislative publication commonly known as the “Tennessee Legislative Record” shall be published in printed form only at the conclusion of each annual session of the general assembly or as requested by any member of the general assembly for that member's official duties; provided, that the information shall continue to be compiled, updated and available on the official web site of the Tennessee general assembly during such sessions.

Acts 2009, ch. 225, § 1.

3-1-122. Forwarding of former general assembly member's e-mail.

A former member of the general assembly may request that e-mails sent to the former member's legislative e-mail address be automatically forwarded to the former member's private e-mail address for up to twelve (12) months from the former member's last official day of service as a member of the general assembly. This section shall not apply to members of the general assembly who are removed from office or who resign from office.

Acts 2009, ch. 507, § 1.

3-1-123. Filing of report with legislative reference and law library
and office of the speaker of the house of representatives.

If a statute requires an official or entity to make a report to the general assembly, the speakers of the general assembly, a committee of the general assembly, or any combination thereof, then a copy of the report shall also be filed with the legislative reference and law library.

In addition to the filing requirement in subsection (a), if a statute requires an official or entity to make a report to the general assembly, the house of representatives, a committee of the house of representatives, or any combination thereof, then the official or entity must also file a copy of the report with the office of the speaker of the house of representatives.

Acts 2016, ch. 651, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 651, § 3, provided that this act, which enacted this section, shall apply to reports filed on or after July 1, 2016.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 651, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.